Utah statutes.
78B-6-1210.   When all holders of recorded rights are not made parties --
Procedure -- Reference.
If there are outstanding liens or encumbrances of record upon the property
when the action is commenced, the persons holding the liens shall be made
parties to the action.  If the persons are not made parties, the court shall
either order the persons made parties to the action by an amendment or
supplemental complaint, or appoint a referee to determine whether the liens or
encumbrances have been paid.  If the referee determines that amounts remain
due, the referee shall determine whether the amounts are secured or unsecured
and the order of precedence among all the liens or encumbrances on the
property.
